lexc/noun/enhuero.lexc
LEXICON Case8
+Tem:^+cTem^akor             #;    ! kor
+Forp:^+ccForp^a§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^a§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^aként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Nom:^+cNom^a             #;  ! 

! uses Poss, fam, gen case of addnoun
LEXICON AddNounutolso
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurutolso;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;


LEXICON Plurutolso
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! ajtaja
LEXICON AddNoun11
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss11;

LEXICON Poss11
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^a§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^a§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^aim   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^aid   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ai   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^aink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^ait§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^aik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
        
! ajtaja
LEXICON AddNoun111
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss111;

LEXICON Poss111
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^aja   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^ajuk   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^aim   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^aid   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ai   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^aink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^aitok   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^aik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^ajaim   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^ajaid   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ajai   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^ajaink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^ajaitok   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^ajaik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik


LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;

LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely;
 
LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


! szőleje
LEXICON AddNoun13
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss13;

LEXICON Poss13
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^e§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^e§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^eim   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^eid   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ei   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^eink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^eit§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^eik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

! ideig
LEXICON AddNoun131
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss131;

LEXICON Poss131
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^e§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^e§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^eim   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^eid   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ei   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^eink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^eit§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^eik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
            Case131;

LEXICON Case131
+Ter:eig            #;  ! eig

! utolja, tüdeje, teteje
LEXICON AddNoun15
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss15;

LEXICON Poss15
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
        

LEXICON Noun
acélerő:acéler AddNoun13;
ajtómező AddNoun;
algamező:algamez AddNoun13;
alkoholzászló:alkoholzászl AddNoun11;
alumíniumtető:alumíniumtete AddNoun15;
anyavaddisznó:anyavaddiszn AddNoun111;
apródidő:apródid AddNoun131;
aratásidő AddNoun;
atomdisznó:atomdiszn AddNoun111;
bambusztető:bambusztete AddNoun15;
bankajtó:bankajt AddNoun11;
barkavessző:barkavessz AddNoun13;
beállítómező AddNoun;
blokkerdő:blokkerd AddNoun13;
brigádzászló AddNoun;
bruttóhatáridő:bruttóhatárid AddNoun131;
buboréktető:buboréktete AddNoun15;
buszhátsó:buszhátu AddNoun11;
bádoghintó:bádoghint AddNoun111;
bárkatető:bárkatete AddNoun15;
bíró AddNoun;
bükkerdő:bükkerd AddNoun13;
bőrhintó:bőrhint AddNoun111;
cellaajtó:cellaajt AddNoun11;
ceremóniahintó:ceremóniahint AddNoun111;
cilindertető:cilindertete AddNoun15;
csalánmező AddNoun;
csatadisznó:csatadiszn AddNoun111;
cserehatáridő:cserehatárid AddNoun131;
cseréptető:cseréptete AddNoun15;
csikó:csik AddNoun111;
csodaerdő AddNoun;
csokorerdő:csokorerd AddNoun13;
csoportutolsó AddNounutolso;
csónaktető:csónaktete AddNoun15;
csúcszászló:csúcszászl AddNoun11;
csődörcsikó:csődörcsik AddNoun111;
céklamező AddNoun;
diófahintó:diófahint AddNoun111;
dobogótető:dobogótete AddNoun15;
dologidő:dologid AddNoun131;
dolomitmező:dolomitmez AddNoun13;
dunnatető:dunnatete AddNoun15;
díszdisznó:díszdiszn AddNoun111;
ebédlőajtó:ebédlőajt AddNoun11;
elzáróajtó AddNoun;
eperdisznó:eperdiszn AddNoun111;
esernyőerdő:esernyőerd AddNoun13;
esőtető:esőtete AddNoun15;
etetésidő:etetésid AddNoun131;
fatüdő:fatüde AddNoun15;
felszállóajtó:felszállóajt AddNoun11;
feltételmező AddNoun;
fogaterő:fogater AddNoun13;
fojtótető:fojtótete AddNoun15;
folyamatidő:folyamatid AddNoun131;
féldisznó:féldiszn AddNoun111;
félzsidó:félzsid AddNoun131;
fészertető:fészertete AddNoun15;
fóliatető AddNoun;
függönyajtó:függönyajt AddNoun11;
fővonzóerő:fővonzóer AddNoun13;
fűrésztető:fűrésztete AddNoun15;
gyalogezredzászló:gyalogezredzászl AddNoun11;
gyaloghintó:gyaloghint AddNoun111;
gyalogosidő:gyalogosid AddNoun131;
gyermekszabadidő AddNoun;
gyártető:gyártete AddNoun15;
gyémántvessző:gyémántvessz AddNoun13;
gőztető:gőztete AddNoun15;
hangárajtó:hangárajt AddNoun11;
hegyestető AddNoun;
hegytető:hegytete AddNoun15;
hevedermező:hevedermez AddNoun13;
hintavaddisznó:hintavaddiszn AddNoun111;
holdidő:holdid AddNoun131;
hídtető:hídtete AddNoun15;
hízódisznó:hízódiszn AddNoun111;
hűségzászló:hűségzászl AddNoun11;
illetékmező:illetékmez AddNoun13;
impulzusidő AddNoun;
inasidő:inasid AddNoun131;
járműajtó:járműajt AddNoun11;
játékidő:játékid AddNoun131;
kajüttető:kajüttete AddNoun15;
kamaráserdő:kamaráserd AddNoun13;
kancacsikó AddNoun;
kancacsikó:kancacsik AddNoun111;
kastélytető:kastélytete AddNoun15;
kattanóajtó:kattanóajt AddNoun11;
keretidő:keretid AddNoun131;
királydisznó:királydiszn AddNoun111;
kisgazdaerő:kisgazdaer AddNoun13;
kitűzőzászló:kitűzőzászl AddNoun11;
klauzúraajtó AddNoun;
konyhabútorajtó:konyhabútorajt AddNoun11;
koronatető:koronatete AddNoun15;
kulákidő:kulákid AddNoun131;
kutatóvessző:kutatóvessz AddNoun13;
kártyaidő AddNoun;
kódzászló:kódzászl AddNoun11;
középidő:középid AddNoun131;
kőerdő:kőerd AddNoun13;
kőtető:kőtete AddNoun15;
legeslegutolsó AddNounutolso;
legutolsó AddNounutolso;
lelkierő AddNoun;
lengőajtó:lengőajt AddNoun11;
lidércidő:lidércid AddNoun131;
luxushintó:luxushint AddNoun111;
léptékmező:léptékmez AddNoun13;
magdisznó:magdiszn AddNoun111;
maradékidő AddNoun;
maratonhintó:maratonhint AddNoun111;
marhatüdő:marhatüde AddNoun15;
mellékszobaajtó:mellékszobaajt AddNoun11;
menetidő:menetid AddNoun131;
meteormező:meteormez AddNoun13;
médiaajtó AddNoun;
méncsikó:méncsik AddNoun111;
mérkőzésidő:mérkőzésid AddNoun131;
nagyagyvelő:nagyagyvel AddNoun13;
nappaliajtó:nappaliajt AddNoun11;
nyomdaidő:nyomdaid AddNoun131;
nádtető:nádtete AddNoun15;
nőbíró AddNoun;
olajmező:olajmez AddNoun13;
osztályzászló:osztályzászl AddNoun11;
paradicsomtető:paradicsomtete AddNoun15;
pihenőidő AddNoun;
pisztáciaerdő:pisztáciaerd AddNoun13;
planétaidő:planétaid AddNoun131;
plüsscsikó:plüsscsik AddNoun111;
portálajtó:portálajt AddNoun11;
pónihintó:pónihint AddNoun111;
rabszolgaidő:rabszolgaid AddNoun131;
raktártető:raktártete AddNoun15;
raktérajtó:raktérajt AddNoun11;
referenciamező AddNoun;
rendezvényidő:rendezvényid AddNoun131;
retinamező:retinamez AddNoun13;
seregzászló:seregzászl AddNoun11;
sisakbelső AddNoun;
somszőlő:somszől AddNoun13;
soridő:sorid AddNoun131;
szellőzőajtó:szellőzőajt AddNoun11;
szerveridő:szerverid AddNoun131;
szobadisznó AddNoun;
szobadisznó:szobadiszn AddNoun111;
szopóerő:szopóer AddNoun13;
szériaajtó:szériaajt AddNoun11;
szériatető:szériatete AddNoun15;
sétaidő:sétaid AddNoun131;
sütőbelső:sütőbels AddNoun13;
takaróajtó:takaróajt AddNoun11;
talmudzsidó AddNoun;
tejdisznó:tejdiszn AddNoun111;
tenyészidő:tenyészid AddNoun131;
tetőteraszajtó:tetőteraszajt AddNoun11;
tolótető:tolótete AddNoun15;
tranzitmunkaerő AddNoun;
táblamező:táblamez AddNoun13;
támadóidő:támadóid AddNoun131;
tölgyfaajtó:tölgyfaajt AddNoun11;
törpedisznó:törpediszn AddNoun111;
túlóraidő:túlóraid AddNoun131;
tűrésmező:tűrésmez AddNoun13;
tűzmező AddNoun;
utolsó AddNounutolso;
vaddisznó:vaddiszn AddNoun111;
vakajtó:vakajt AddNoun11;
vastető:vastete AddNoun15;
videoidő:videoid AddNoun131;
videódisznó:videódiszn AddNoun111;
visszatartóerő:visszatartóer AddNoun13;
vitrinajtó AddNoun;
várakozásidő:várakozásid AddNoun131;
vászonzászló:vászonzászl AddNoun11;
zebracsikó:zebracsik AddNoun111;
álomhintó AddNoun;
árnyékerdő:árnyékerd AddNoun13;
égésidő:égésid AddNoun131;
épülettető:épülettete AddNoun15;
ércdisznó:ércdiszn AddNoun111;
észutolsó AddNounutolso;
évfolyamutolsó AddNounutolso;
évfolyamzászló:évfolyamzászl AddNoun11;
úszásidő:úszásid AddNoun131;
úszóerő:úszóer AddNoun13;
ütemidő AddNoun;
üveghintó:üveghint AddNoun111;
